Texas statutes.
ELECTION CODE

TITLE 14. ELECTION CONTESTS

SUBTITLE C. CONTESTS IN OTHER TRIBUNALS

CHAPTER 243. CONTEST FOR PRESIDENTIAL ELECTORS

Sec. 243.001. APPLICABILITY OF CHAPTER. This chapter applies to a contest of an election of presidential electors for president and vice-president of the United States.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 243.002. PARTIES. (a) An election of presidential electors may be contested only by:

(1) a presidential candidate whose name appeared on the ballot for the election in this state or who had qualified as a write-in candidate in this state;

(2) any one or more of the presidential elector candidates who correspond to a presidential candidate specified by Subdivision (1), if the presidential candidate gives express approval; or

(3) a presidential candidate specified by Subdivision (1) and one or more corresponding presidential elector candidates acting jointly.

(b) The contestees are the presidential elector candidates officially determined to be elected and the presidential candidate to whom they correspond.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 243.003. PETITION. (a) The contestant must state the grounds for the contest in a petition in the same manner as a petition in an election contest in the district court.

(b) The contestant must file the petition with the secretary of state not later than the later of the 10th day after the date the election records are publicly available under Section 1.012 or the official result of the contested election is determined.

(c) The contestant may not file the petition before the day after the date of the contested election.

(d) The petition must state the name and address of the contestant or an agent for the contestant to whom a copy of the contestee's answer is to be delivered. If there is more than one contestant, the petition must designate one to receive the copy on behalf of all the contestants.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1215 (S.B. 902), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 243.004. NOTICE TO CONTESTEES. (a) When a petition is filed, the secretary of state shall promptly notify each contestee of the filing and shall deliver a copy of the petition to each contestee who requests one or to an agent designated by the requesting contestee.

(b) The secretary of state shall use the most expeditious means available for notifying each contestee.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 243.005. ANSWER. (a) The contestee must reply to the contestant's petition in an answer in the same manner as an answer to a petition in an election contest in the district court.

(b) The contestee must file the answer with the secretary of state not later than the eighth day after the date the petition is filed. The contestee must deliver a copy of the answer by the same deadline to the person designated by the petition to receive it.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 243.006. HEARING OF CONTEST. When the contestee's answer is filed, the governor shall set a time and place for hearing the contest. After notice to the parties, the governor shall investigate the issues raised by the contest, hearing all legal evidence presented by the parties.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 163, Sec. 11, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 243.007. MASTER OF DISCOVERY. (a) The governor may appoint a master of discovery for the contest. The master has the authority of a master appointed under Section 241.009.

(b) The master must be a resident of the state who:

(1) is not employed by or related within the third degree by consanguinity or affinity, as determined under Chapter 573, Government Code, to a party to the contest; and

(2) is not an officer of a political party that had a presidential nominee on the ballot of the contested election.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 163, Sec. 12, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 561, Sec. 19, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 5.95(27), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 243.008. DISCOVERY AND DEPOSITIONS. (a) Any party to a contest may conduct discovery and take depositions under the procedures applicable to a civil suit in the district court, subject to changes in those procedures or limitations imposed by the governor or the master of discovery.

(b) Each party is responsible for the initial payment of the party's costs of discovery and taking depositions, but the costs may be assessed as provided by Section 243.013.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 163, Sec. 13, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 243.009. HEARING PROCEDURE. The governor shall determine the procedure for hearing an election contest.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 163, Sec. 14, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 243.010. EVIDENCE. Except as otherwise provided by the governor, the rules of evidence generally applicable to a civil suit in the district court apply to the hearing of an election contest.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 163, Sec. 14, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 243.011. ATTENDANCE OF WITNESSES. (a) The governor has the same authority as a district court in an election contest to require the attendance of witnesses and the production of evidence. The secretary of state shall issue in the name of the governor subpoenas or other process as directed by the governor.

(b) Any sheriff or constable of the state or a person appointed by the governor may serve the process issued by the secretary of state.

(c) Compliance with process issued under this chapter may be enforced in the manner provided for enforcement of process issued under Chapter 2001, Government Code.

(d) The summoned witnesses and the officers serving the process are entitled to mileage and fees as prescribed by law in a civil suit in the district court.

(e) Each party is responsible for the initial payment of the costs for service of process and attendance of witnesses at the party's request, but the costs may be assessed as provided by Section 243.013.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 163, Sec. 15, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 5.95(49), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 243.012. DISPOSITION OF CONTEST. (a) The governor shall determine the outcome of the contested election and render the decision not later than the seventh day before the date set by law for the meeting of the electors.

(b) The decision shall declare which set of presidential elector candidates was elected.

(c) The decision shall be in writing and signed by the governor.

(d) Section 221.012(b) does not apply to a contest of an election of presidential electors.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 163, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 243.013. COSTS OF CONTEST. The governor may assess the costs of the contest against any one or more of the parties.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 163, Sec. 17, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.